Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 34

Geographic Territories of Electric Utility Systems

65-34-101. Legislative intent — Findings.

The general assembly hereby finds that:

Duplication of electric system facilities leads to excessive consumer costs and adverse environmental and aesthetic impacts;

The public health, safety, and welfare require that electric service to a particular geographic area be provided by a single electric system;

The general assembly has heretofore established the geographic territories of electric systems as those geographic areas in which a particular electric system maintained facilities to provide electric service on March 6, 1968, except as those geographic areas have been modified by statutorily authorized agreements among adjacent electric systems, all as provided by § 6-51-112;

Maintenance of the previously established geographic territories, as modified by statutorily authorized agreements, continues to be in the public interest and promotes the public health, safety and welfare;

The consumer owners of municipal and cooperative electric systems have invested large sums in facilities and equipment necessary to provide electric service within areas served by those electric systems; and

It would be contrary to the public interest to permit utilities that are not consumer owned to expand service into areas already served by consumer owned municipal and cooperative electric systems, as such expansion would result in a duplication of service facilities and the loss of consumer investment in displaced facilities.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 1.

65-34-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Current geographic territory” means the parcels of land, as such parcels are defined or designated by the assessor of property of the county in which the parcels are located, to which a public electric system was providing electric service on February 16, 1989. In any case in which more than one (1) public electric system was providing electric service to a parcel of land on such date, the parcel shall be included within the current geographic territory of the public electric system that first provided electric service to such parcel. Should a public electric system enter into an agreement authorized by § 65-34-108, the current geographic territory of that public electric system shall be modified as provided in that agreement;

“Electric and community service cooperative” has the meaning set forth in § 65-25-102(4);

“Municipal electric system” means any electric system owned by any county, municipality, power district, or other subdivision of Tennessee;

“Non-consumer owned electric system” means any public electric system other than electric and community service cooperatives and municipal electric systems; and

“Public electric system” includes electric and community service cooperatives, municipal electric systems, and every individual, co-partnership, association, corporation or joint stock company, their lessees, trustees or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, that own, operate, manage, or control any electric power system, plant, or equipment within Tennessee affected by and dedicated to public use.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. A solar electricity generating facility that comes within the statutory definition of “public electric system” is prohibited from selling power in certain geographical territories. Whether its property is “affected by and dedicated to public use” will depend on a variety of factors, specific to each case. The fact that it provides power “directly and exclusively to owners and/or tenants located on the same or adjacent premises” is just one of many factors to be considered but is not alone determinative of whether or not its property is affected by and dedicated to public use. If the owner of a solar electricity generating facility is a public electric system as defined in T.C.A. § 65-34-102(5), it would likewise be a public utility as defined in T.C.A. § 65-4-101(6)(A) unless it were to come within one of the many statutory exceptions detailed in T.C.A. § 65-4-101(6)(A)(i) through (B)(ii). OAG 17-25, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (4/10/2017).

65-34-103. Non-consumer owned electric systems — Expansion limits.

No non-consumer owned electric system may construct, acquire, or maintain facilities, lines, poles, or other equipment used or useful for the distribution or sale of electricity outside its current geographic territory, nor may any non-consumer owned electric system provide, by sale or otherwise, electricity to any parcel of land located outside its current geographic territory. Should a non-consumer owned electric system enter into an agreement authorized by § 65-34-108, the current geographic territory of that non-consumer owned electric system and the current geographic territory of the municipal electric system or electric and community service cooperative system, which is a party to the agreement, shall be modified as provided in that agreement; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall restrict the construction, acquisition, or maintenance of facilities, lines, poles, or other equipment used exclusively in this state for the transmission or sale at wholesale of electricity to electric and community service cooperatives or municipal electric systems.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. A solar electricity generating facility that comes within the statutory definition of “public electric system” is prohibited from selling power in certain geographical territories. Whether its property is “affected by and dedicated to public use” will depend on a variety of factors, specific to each case. The fact that it provides power “directly and exclusively to owners and/or tenants located on the same or adjacent premises” is just one of many factors to be considered but is not alone determinative of whether or not its property is affected by and dedicated to public use. If the owner of a solar electricity generating facility is a public electric system as defined in T.C.A. § 65-34-102(5), it would likewise be a public utility as defined in T.C.A. § 65-4-101(6)(A) unless it were to come within one of the many statutory exceptions detailed in T.C.A. § 65-4-101(6)(A)(i) through (B)(ii). OAG 17-25, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (4/10/2017).

65-34-104. Non-consumer owned electric systems — Removal of equipment, facilities.

Any non-consumer owned electric system owning any lines, poles, facilities, or other equipment used or useful for the distribution or sale of electricity located outside the non-consumer owned electric system's current geographic territory on any property or right-of-way owned by the state or by any county or municipality or other subdivision of the state must remove such equipment or facilities at the non-consumer owned electric system's expense within six (6) months of May 2, 1989.

If the non-consumer owned electric system owning or otherwise exercising control over such equipment or facilities neglects to remove the equipment or facilities within six (6) months of May 2, 1989, the governmental entity owning the property or right-of-way on which such equipment or facilities are located may, after notice to the non-consumer owned electric system and opportunity for hearing, remove and dispose of such equipment or facilities in whatever manner it deems appropriate, if it determines that such equipment or facilities are located outside the non-consumer owned electric system's current geographic territory. The manner of disposal may include, without limitation, selling such equipment or facilities for other utility use or for scrap and applying the proceeds of such disposal to offset the costs the governmental entity incurred in removing such equipment or facilities. The requirement for removal shall not apply to equipment or facilities otherwise lawfully located on public rights-of-way used solely for the transmission of electricity for parcels of land within the non-consumer owned electric system's current geographic territory.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 4.

65-34-105. Tennessee public utility commission — Jurisdiction — Powers.

The Tennessee public utility commission has jurisdiction to hear and resolve any disputes concerning the boundaries of the current geographic territories of nonconsumer owned electric systems. The commission may promulgate and enforce appropriate rules not inconsistent with this chapter.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 5; 1995, ch. 305, § 41; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 68, 81.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” and substituted “The commission” for “The authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-34-106. Eminent domain.

Electric and community service cooperatives and municipal electric systems may in the exercise of their powers of eminent domain acquire facilities, equipment, and service areas of non-consumer owned electric systems, notwithstanding the fact that such facilities and equipment shall be dedicated to utility use following their acquisition.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 6.

65-34-107. Municipalities — Powers — Limitations.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair the right and power of municipalities to operate or authorize the operation of municipal electric systems or electric and community service cooperatives within their municipal boundaries consistent with § 6-51-112.

The provisions of § 6-51-111 to the contrary notwithstanding, municipalities may not through the grant of franchises or other operating authority expand the current geographic territories of non-consumer owned electric systems.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 7.

65-34-108. Agreements among public electric systems — Legislative intent.

Two (2) or more public electric systems serving adjacent current geographic territories may enter into an agreement by which their current geographic territories are modified and by which equipment, facilities, and the right to serve specified parcels of land are transferred from one (1) public electric system to another. In negotiating and executing such an agreement, the general assembly hereby expresses its intent that public electric systems replace competition with the monopoly public service.

Acts 1989, ch. 230, § 8.